West Virginia, session 2026, HB4983.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. AUTHORIZATION FOR DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE TO     PROMULGATE LEGISLATIVE RULES. §64-10-1. Department of Commerce. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 8, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5B-1-9 of this code, relating to the Division of Economic Development (Tourism Development Districts, 145 CSR 16), is authorized. (b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 12, 2026, authorized under the authority of §5B-2-21 of this code, modified by the Department of Commerce to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on January 29, 2026, relating to the Department of Commerce (certification of a microgrid district or certification as a high impact data center, 145 CSR 20), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 1, subsection 2.4., after the word “use” by inserting the words “or access of water”. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home